Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-6102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Long-Term Care Savings Plan Act:

(1) Long-term care expense means the cost of long-term care in a long-term care facility and the cost of care provided in a person's home when the person receiving the care is unable to perform multiple basic life functions independently;

(2) Long-term care insurance premiums means premiums paid for a long-term care insurance policy issued pursuant to the Long-Term Care Insurance Act that offers coverage to the individual, the individual's spouse, or another person for whom the taxpayer has an insurable interest;

(3) Participant means an individual who has entered into a participation agreement or established an account with a financial institution with which the State Treasurer has an agreement under subsection (1) of section 77-6103; and

(4) Qualified individual means (a) a person who incurred long-term care expenses during the taxable year or (b) a person who turned fifty years of age or older during the taxable year who made payments for long-term care insurance premiums during the taxable year.

Laws 2006, LB 965, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB304, § 1.
January 1, 2018